Alabama, session 2026rs, HB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 3

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
HB257 INTRODUCED
85 Section 1. Sections 13A-6-43, 13A-6-44, 13A-6-68,
86 13A-6-111, 13A-6-124, and 13A-6-243, Code of Alabama 1975, are
87 amended to read as follows:
88 "§13A-6-43
89 (a) A person commits the crime of kidnapping in the
90 first degree if he or she abducts another person with intent
91 to do any of the following:
92 (1) Hold him or her for ransom or reward; or.
93 (2) Use him or her as a shield or hostage; or.
94 (3) Accomplish or aid the commission of any felony or
95 flight therefrom; or.
96 (4) Inflict physical injury upon him or her, or to
97 violate or abuse him or her sexually; or.
98 (5) Terrorize him or her or a third person; or.
99 (6) Interfere with the performance of any governmental
100 or political function.
101 (b) A person does not commit the crime of kidnapping in
102 the first degree if he voluntarily releases the victim alive,
103 and not suffering from serious physical injury, in a safe
104 place prior to apprehension. The burden of injecting the issue
105 of voluntary safe release is on the defendant, but this does
106 not shift the burden of proof. This subsection does not apply
107 to a prosecution for or preclude a conviction of kidnapping in
108 the second degree or any other crime.
109 (c)(b) Kidnapping in the first degree is a Class A
110 felony."
111 "§13A-6-44
112 (a) A person commits the crime of kidnapping in the
Page 4

(a) A person commits the crime of kidnapping in the
HB257 INTRODUCED
113 second degree if he or she abducts another person using, or
114 with the intent to use, deception, physical force, or deadly
115 physical force.
116 (b) A person does not commit a crime under this section
117 if:
118 (1) The abduction is not coupled with intent to use or
119 to threaten to use deadly force,
120 (2) The actor is a relative of the person abducted, and
121 (3) The(b)(1) It is an affirmative defense to a
122 violation of this section if the actor's sole purpose is to
123 assume lawful control of that person.
124 (2) The burden of injecting the issue of defense under
125 this subsection is on the defendant, but this does not shift
126 the burden of proof.
127 (c) Kidnapping in the second degree is a Class B
128 felony."
129 "§13A-6-68
130 (a) A person commits the crime of indecent exposure if,
131 with intent to arouse or gratify sexual desire of himself or
132 herself, or of any person other than his or her spouse, he or
133 she exposes his or her genitals under circumstances in which
134 he or she knows the conduct is likely to cause affront or
135 alarm.
136 (b)(1) Indecent exposure is a Class A misdemeanor
137 except a third or subsequent conviction shall be.
138 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), indecent exposure
139 is a Class C felony under either of the following
140 circumstances:
Page 5

circumstances:
HB257 INTRODUCED
141 a. If any victim of the offense is under 12 years of
142 age.
143 b. If the person has two or more prior convictions
144 under this article."
145 "§13A-6-111
146 (a) A person is guilty of transmitting obscene material
147 to a child if the person transmits to a child, or another
148 person believed by the defendant to be a child, by means of
149 any cellular device, online application, computer
150 communication system allowing the input, output, examination,
151 or transfer of computer programs from one computer to another,
152 or any other electronic means, material which, in whole or in
153 part, depicts actual or simulated nudity, sexual conduct, or
154 sadomasochistic abuse, for the purpose of initiating or
155 engaging in sexual acts sexual conduct pursuant to Section
156 13A-12-200.1, sexual performance, or a sex offense pursuant to
157 Section 15-20A-5 with the child.
158 (b) For the purposes of this section, a "child"
159 includes any person under 17 years of age.
160 (c) For purposes of determining jurisdiction, the
161 offense is committed in this state if the transmission that
162 constitutes the offense either originates in this state or is
163 received in this state and shall be considered to be committed
164 in any county in which any part of the crime took place or in
165 the county of residence of the victim or defendant.
166 (d) A person charged under this section shall be tried
167 as an adult and the record of the proceeding shall not be
168 sealed nor subject to expungement.
Page 6

sealed nor subject to expungement.
HB257 INTRODUCED
169 (e) It shall not be a defense to prosecution under this
170 section that an undercover operative or law enforcement
171 officer was involved in the detection and investigation of an
172 offense.
173 (f)(e) Transmitting obscene material of engaging in
174 sexual intercourse, sodomy, or to engage in a sexual
175 performance, obscene sexual performance, or sexual conduct for
176 his or her benefit to a child A violation of this section is a
177 Class B felony."
178 "§13A-6-124
179 (a) Any person who travels either within this state, to
180 this state, or from this state by any means, who attempts to
181 do so, or who knowingly causes another to do so or to attempt
182 to do so for the purpose of engaging in any unlawful sex act
183 with a child, or another person believed by the defendant to
184 be a child, including sexual intercourse, sodomy, a sexual
185 conduct pursuant to Section 13A-12-200.1, sexual performance,
186 obscene sexual performance, or other sexual conduct or a sex
187 offense pursuant to Section 15-20A-5 for his or her benefit or
188 for the benefit of another shall be guilty of traveling to
189 meet a child for an unlawful sex act.
190 (b) Any person who violates this section commits a
191 Class A felony. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
192 conviction under this section shall be considered a criminal
193 sex offense under Section 15-20-21."
194 "§13A-6-243
195 (a)(1) A person commits the crime of directing a child
196 to engage in sexual intercourse or sodomy if he or she
Page 7

to engage in sexual intercourse or sodomy if he or she
HB257 INTRODUCED
197 knowingly entices, allures, persuades, induces, or directs any
198 person under the age of 12 years of the following to engage in
199 sexual intercourse or sodomy with another person:
200 a. A child under 12 years of age.
201 b. A child 12 or more years of age, but less than 16
202 years of age, provided the child is two or more years younger
203 than the other person.
204 (2) Directing a child to engage in sexual intercourse
205 or sodomy is a Class A felony.
206 (b)(1) A person commits the crime of directing a child
207 to engage in sexual contact if he or she knowingly entices,
208 allures, persuades, induces, or directs any person under the
209 age of 12 years of the following to engage in sexual contact
210 with another person:
211 a. A child under 12 years of age.
212 b. A child 12 or more years of age, but less than 16
213 years of age, provided the child is two or more years younger
214 than the other person.
215 (2) A violation of this sectionDirecting a child to
216 engage in sexual contact is a Class B felony."
217 Section 2. It shall not be a defense to prosecution
218 under Article 6 of Chapter 6 of Title 13A, Code of Alabama
219 1975, that an undercover operative or law enforcement officer
220 was involved in the detection and investigation of an offense.
221 Section 3. Sections 15-20A-5 and 15-25-31, Code of
222 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
223 "§15-20A-5
224 For the purposes of this chapter, a sex offense
Page 8

For the purposes of this chapter, a sex offense
HB257 INTRODUCED
225 includes any of the following offenses:
226 (1) Rape in the first degree, as provided by Section
227 13A-6-61.
228 (2) Rape in the second degree, as provided by Section
229 13A-6-62. A juvenile sex offender adjudicated delinquent of a
230 violation of rape in the second degree is presumed to be
231 exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been counseled
232 on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she was
233 adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
234 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
235 to this chapter.
236 (3) Sodomy in the first degree, as provided by Section
237 13A-6-63.
238 (4) Sodomy in the second degree, as provided by Section
239 13A-6-64. A juvenile sex offender adjudicated delinquent of a
240 violation of sodomy in the second degree is presumed to be
241 exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been counseled
242 on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she was
243 adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
244 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
245 to this chapter.
246 (5) Sexual misconduct, as provided by Section 13A-6-65,
247 provided that on a first conviction or adjudication the sex
248 offender is only subject to registration and verification
249 pursuant to this chapter. On a second or subsequent conviction
250 or adjudication of a sex offense, if the second or subsequent
251 conviction or adjudication does not arise out of the same set
252 of facts and circumstances as the first conviction or
Page 9

of facts and circumstances as the first conviction or
HB257 INTRODUCED
253 adjudication of a sex offense, the sex offender shall comply
254 with all requirements of this chapter. A juvenile sex offender
255 adjudicated delinquent of a violation of sexual misconduct is
256 presumed to be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has
257 been counseled on the dangers of the conduct for which he or
258 she was adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court
259 makes a determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be
260 subject to this chapter.
261 (6) Sexual torture, as provided by Section 13A-6-65.1.
262 (7) Sexual abuse in the first degree, as provided by
263 Section 13A-6-66.
264 (8) Sexual abuse in the second degree, as provided by
265 Section 13A-6-67.
266 (9) Indecent exposure, as provided by Section 13A-6-68,
267 provided that on a first conviction or adjudication of a sex
268 offense, the sex offender is only subject to registration and
269 verification pursuant to this chapter. On a second or
270 subsequent conviction or adjudication of a sex offense, if the
271 second or subsequent conviction or adjudication does not arise
272 out of the same set of facts and circumstances as the first
273 conviction or adjudication, the sex offender shall comply with
274 all requirements of this chapter. A juvenile sex offender
275 adjudicated of a violation of indecent exposure is presumed to
276 be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been
277 counseled on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she
278 was adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
279 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
280 to this chapter.
Page 10

to this chapter.
HB257 INTRODUCED
281 (10) Enticing a child to enter a vehicle, room, house,
282 office, or other place for immoral purposes, as provided by
283 Section 13A-6-69.
284 (11) Sexual abuse of a child less than 12 years old, as
285 provided by Section 13A-6-69.1.
286 (12) Promoting prostitution in the first degree, as
287 provided by Section 13A-12-111.
288 (13) Promoting prostitution in the second degree, as
289 provided by Section 13A-12-112.
290 (14) Violation of the Alabama Child Pornography Act, as
291 provided by Section 13A-12-191, 13A-12-192, 13A-12-196, or
292 13A-12-197. A juvenile sex offender adjudicated delinquent of
293 a violation of the Alabama Child Pornography Act is presumed
294 to be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been
295 counseled on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she
296 was adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
297 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
298 to this chapter.
299 (15) Unlawful imprisonment in the first degree, as
300 provided by Section 13A-6-41, if the victim of the offense is
301 a minor, and the record of adjudication or conviction reflects
302 the intent of the unlawful imprisonment was to abuse the minor
303 sexually.
304 (16) Unlawful imprisonment in the second degree, as
305 provided by Section 13A-6-42, if the victim of the offense is
306 a minor, and the record of adjudication or conviction reflects
307 the intent of the unlawful imprisonment was to abuse the minor
308 sexually.
Page 11

sexually.
HB257 INTRODUCED
309 (17) Kidnapping in the first degree, as provided by
310 subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of Section 13A-6-43, if the
311 intent of the abduction is to violate or abuse the victim
312 sexually.
313 (18) Kidnapping of a minor, except by a parent,
314 guardian, or custodian, as provided by Section 13A-6-43 or
315 13A-6-44.
316 (19) Incest, as provided by Section 13A-13-3.
317 (20) Transmitting obscene material to a child by
318 computer, as provided by Section 13A-6-111.
319 (21) School employee engaging in a sex act or deviant
320 sexual intercourse with a student, or having sexual contact or
321 soliciting a sex act or sexual contact with a student, as
322 provided by Sections 13A-6-81 and 13A-6-82.
323 (22) Foster parent engaging in a sex act, having sexual
324 contact, or soliciting a sex act or sexual contact with a
325 foster child, as provided by Section 13A-6-71.
326 (23) Facilitating solicitation of unlawful sexual
327 conduct with a child, as provided by Section 13A-6-121.
328 (24) Electronic solicitation of a child, as provided by
329 Section 13A-6-122.
330 (25) Facilitating the on-line solicitation of a child,
331 as provided by Section 13A-6-123.
332 (26) Traveling to meet a child for an unlawful sex act,
333 as provided by Section 13A-6-124.
334 (27) Facilitating the travel of a child for an unlawful
335 sex act, as provided by Section 13A-6-125.
336 (28) Human trafficking in the first degree, as provided
Page 12

(28) Human trafficking in the first degree, as provided
HB257 INTRODUCED
337 by Section 13A-6-152, provided that the offense involves
338 sexual servitude.
339 (29) Human trafficking in the second degree, as
340 provided by Section 13A-6-153, provided that the offense
341 involves sexual servitude.
342 (30) Custodial sexual misconduct, as provided by
343 Section 14-11-31.
344 (31) Sexual extortion, as provided by Section
345 13A-6-241.
346 (32) Directing a child to engage in a sex act, as
347 provided in Section 13A-6-243.
348 (33) Voyeurism in the first degree, as provided in
349 Section 13A-11-41.
350 (33)(34) Any offense which is the same as or equivalent
351 to any offense set forth above as the same existed and was
352 defined under the laws of this state existing at the time of
353 such conviction, specifically including, but not limited to,
354 crime against nature, as provided by Section 13-1-110; rape,
355 as provided by Sections 13-1-130 and 13-1-131; carnal
356 knowledge of a woman or girl, as provided by Sections 13-1-132
357 through 13-1-135, or attempting to do so, as provided by
358 Section 13-1-136; indecent molestation of children, as defined
359 and provided by Section 13-1-113; indecent exposure, as
360 provided by Section 13-1-111; incest, as provided by Section
361 13-8-3; offenses relative to obscene prints and literature, as
362 provided by Sections 13-7-160 through 13-7-175, inclusive;
363 employing, harboring, procuring or using a girl over 10 and
364 under 18 years of age for the purpose of prostitution or
Page 13

under 18 years of age for the purpose of prostitution or
HB257 INTRODUCED
365 sexual intercourse, as provided by Section 13-7-1; seduction,
366 as defined and provided by Section 13-1-112; a male person
367 peeping into a room occupied by a female, as provided by
368 Section 13-6-6; assault with intent to ravish, as provided by
369 Section 13-1-46; and soliciting a child by computer, as
370 provided by Section 13A-6-110.
371 (34)(35) Any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy to
372 commit any of the offenses listed in subdivisions (1) to
373 (33)(34), inclusive.
374 (35)(36) Any crime committed in Alabama or any other
375 state, the District of Columbia, any United States territory,
376 or a federal, military, Indian, or foreign country
377 jurisdiction which, if it had been committed in this state
378 under the current provisions of law, would constitute an
379 offense listed in subdivisions (1) to (34)(35), inclusive.
380 (36)(37) Any offense specified by Title I of the
381 federal Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006
382 (Pub. L. 109-248, the Sex Offender Registration and
383 Notification Act (SORNA)).
384 (37)(38) Any crime committed in another state, the
385 District of Columbia, any United States territory, or a
386 federal, military, Indian, or foreign country jurisdiction if
387 that jurisdiction also requires that anyone convicted of that
388 crime register as a sex offender in that jurisdiction.
389 (38)(39) Any offender determined in any jurisdiction to
390 be a sex offender shall be considered a sex offender in this
391 state.
392 (39)(40) The foregoing notwithstanding, any crime
Page 14

(39)(40) The foregoing notwithstanding, any crime
HB257 INTRODUCED
393 committed in any jurisdiction which, irrespective of the
394 specific description or statutory elements thereof, is in any
395 way characterized or known as rape, carnal knowledge, sodomy,
396 sexual assault, sexual battery, criminal sexual conduct,
397 criminal sexual contact, sexual abuse, continuous sexual
398 abuse, sexual torture, solicitation of a child, enticing or
399 luring a child, child pornography, lewd and lascivious
400 conduct, taking indecent liberties with a child, molestation
401 of a child, criminal sexual misconduct, video voyeurism, or
402 there has been a finding of sexual motivation.
403 (40)(41) Any crime not listed in this section wherein
404 the underlying felony is an element of the offense and listed
405 in subdivisions (1) to (39)(40), inclusive.
406 (41)(42) Any other offense not provided for in this
407 section wherein there is a finding of sexual motivation as
408 provided by Section 15-20A-6."
409 "§15-25-31
410 An out-of-court statement made by a witness or a victim
411 who is a child under 12 16 years of age at the time the
412 statement is made, or by a protected person as defined in
413 Section 15-25-1, concerning an act that is a material element
414 of any crime involving a physical offense, sexual offense, or
415 violent offense, as defined in Section 15-25-39, which
416 statement is not otherwise admissible in evidence, is
417 admissible in evidence in criminal any court proceedings, if
418 the requirements of Section 15-25-32 are met. "
419 Section 4. (a) As used in this section, the following
420 terms have the following meanings:
Page 15

terms have the following meanings:
HB257 INTRODUCED
421 (1) EMPLOYEE. Any individual who is an employee,
422 contractual employee, or volunteer at an inpatient or
423 residential drug rehabilitation or mental health facility and
424 who has the responsibility for the care, treatment, control,
425 or supervision of patients in the facility.
426 (2) SEXUAL CONDUCT. The term as defined in Section
427 14-11-30, Code of Alabama 1975.
428 (b) A person commits the crime of inpatient custodial
429 sexual misconduct if the person is an employee and solicits or
430 engages in sexual conduct with any other person who is a
431 patient in or committed to an inpatient or residential drug
432 rehabilitation or mental health facility.
433 (c) A violation of this section is a Class C felony.
434 (d)(1) It is the public policy of the state to prohibit
435 without exception all inpatient and residential custodial
436 sexual misconduct.
437 (2) For purposes of prosecution under this section,
438 consent is not a defense and the issue of whether a patient in
439 an inpatient or residential drug rehabilitation or mental
440 health facility consented to any sexual conduct is immaterial.
441 Section 5. Sections 12-21-148, 15-20A-6, and 15-20A-44,
442 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to make conforming changes
443 as follows:
444 "§12-21-148
445 (a) For the purposes of this section, the following
446 terms shall have the following meanings:
447 (1) CERTIFIED FACILITY DOG. A trained working dog that
448 is a graduate of an assistance dog organization, a nonprofit
Page 16

is a graduate of an assistance dog organization, a nonprofit
HB257 INTRODUCED
449 organization that sets standards of training for the health,
450 welfare, task work, and oversight for assistance dogs and
451 their handlers, and shall have at a minimum all of the
452 following:
453 a. Two years of training and must have passed the same
454 public-access test as a service dog.
455 b. Documentation showing that the certified facility
456 dog has graduated from an assistance dog organization.
457 c. A current annual certificate of health from an
458 Alabama veterinarian.
459 d. Proof of liability insurance in the minimum amount
460 of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
461 (2) CERTIFIED HANDLER. A certified handler who has
462 received training from an assistance dog organization and has
463 received training on the protocols and policies of legal
464 proceedings and the role of the certified facility dog and
465 certified handler to assure there is no interference with the
466 collection of evidence and testimony, or the administration of
467 justice.
468 (b) In a legal proceeding, to reduce the stress of a
469 witness and to enhance the ability of the court to obtain full
470 and accurate testimony, the court may allow a certified
471 facility dog to accompany a victim or witness while
472 testifying, or in other court proceedings, if a certified
473 facility dog is available.
474 (c) If the court, in its sole discretion, grants the
475 use of a certified facility dog, and a jury has been empaneled
476 in the legal proceeding, the certified facility dog shall be
Page 17

in the legal proceeding, the certified facility dog shall be
HB257 INTRODUCED
477 accompanied by the certified handler to the witness stand with
478 the witness outside of the presence of the jury, and the
479 certified handler shall return to his or her position in the
480 courtroom within view of the witness stand. Subsequently, the
481 jury shall be seated and the court shall instruct the jury on
482 the presence of the certified facility dog and that the
483 presence of a certified facility dog should not create any
484 prejudice to any party.
485 (d) During trial proceedings, all precautions should be
486 taken to obscure the presence of the dog from the jury.
487 (e) Markings identifying the dog as a certified
488 facility dog while working must be visible.
489 (f) Subject to the Alabama Rules of Criminal Procedure,
490 if requested by either party in a legal proceeding, the court
491 may examine and confirm the credentials of the certified
492 facility dog and certified handler.
493 (g) Prior to the use of a certified facility dog in a
494 court proceeding, the state or moving party must file a notice
495 of intent to use the registered therapy certified facility
496 dog."
497 "§15-20A-6
498 (a)(1) The indictment, count in the indictment,
499 information, complaint, or warrant charging the offense may
500 include a specification of sexual motivation or the
501 prosecuting attorney may file an allegation of sexual
502 motivation in any criminal case classified as a felony or
503 Class A misdemeanor if sufficient admissible evidence exists
504 that would justify a finding of sexual motivation by a
Page 18

that would justify a finding of sexual motivation by a
HB257 INTRODUCED
505 reasonable and objective finder of fact.
506 (2) If a specification is included in the indictment,
507 count in the indictment, information, complaint, or warrant
508 charging the offense, the specification shall be stated at the
509 end of the body of the indictment, count in the indictment,
510 information, complaint, or warrant and shall be in
511 substantially the following form: "SPECIFICATION or
512 SPECIFICATION TO THE FIRST COUNT. The Grand Jurors (or insert
513 appropriate name) further find and specify that the offender
514 committed the offense with a sexual motivation."
515 (3) If the prosecuting attorney files an allegation of
516 sexual motivation, it shall be filed within a reasonable time
517 after indictment to give sufficient notice to the defendant.
518 (b) If the indictment, count of the indictment,
519 information, complaint, or warrant charging the offense
520 includes a specification of sexual motivation or if the
521 prosecuting attorney files an allegation of sexual motivation,
522 the state shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
523 defendant committed the offense with a sexual motivation.
524 (c) The court shall make a written finding of fact, to
525 be made part of the record upon conviction or adjudication as
526 a youthful offender, of whether or not a sexual motivation was
527 present at the time of the commission of the offense unless
528 the defendant has a trial by jury.
529 (d) If a defendant has a trial by jury, the jury, if it
530 finds the defendant guilty, shall also find a special verdict
531 as to whether or not the defendant committed the crime with a
532 sexual motivation.
Page 19

sexual motivation.
HB257 INTRODUCED
533 (e) If there is a finding of sexual motivation, the
534 finding shall be made part of the record of conviction or
535 adjudication.
536 (f) For purposes of this section, sexual motivation
537 means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
538 committed the crime was for the purpose of the sexual
539 gratification of the defendant.
540 (g) This section shall not apply to sex offenses as
541 defined in subdivisions (1) to (40)(41), inclusive, of Section
542 15-20A-5."
543 "§15-20A-44
544 (a) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
545 Agency shall adopt rules establishing an administrative
546 hearing for persons who are only made subject to this chapter
547 pursuant to subdivision (35)(36) of Section 15-20A-5.
548 (b) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
549 Agency shall adopt rules setting forth a listing of offenses
550 from other jurisdictions that are to be considered criminal
551 sex offenses under subdivision (35)(36) of Section 15-20A-5.
552 Thereafter, any individual convicted of any offense set forth
553 in the listing shall immediately be subject to this chapter
554 and shall not be entitled to an administrative hearing as
555 provided in subsection (a).
556 (c) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
557 Agency may adopt any rules as are necessary to implement and
558 enforce this chapter."
559 Section 6. This act shall become effective on October
560 1, 2026.
Page 20